Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.120

Washington scholars' program—Administration—Cooperation with other agencies.

The office of student financial assistance shall have the responsibility for administration of the Washington scholars program. The program will be developed cooperatively with the Washington association of secondary school principals, a voluntary professional association of secondary school principals. The cooperation of other state agencies and private organizations having interest and responsibility in public and private education shall be sought for planning assistance.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 126; 1985 c 370 s 32; 1981 c 54 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.58.824.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Severability—1981 c 54: See note following RCW 28A.600.100.